Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1513
Numerical index.

The register of deeds shall keep a numerical index. If the book form of recording is used, such index shall be as nearly as practicable in the following form:

Numerical IndexSectionTownship

N.E.1/4N.W.1/4GranteeGrantorKind of Instrument

County, NebraskaRange

S.W.1/4S.E.1/4AcresBookPageRemarks

Laws 1885, c. 41, § 7, p. 222;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 9, p. 366;

R.S.1913, § 5628;

C.S.1922, § 4955;

C.S.1929, § 26-1213;

R.S.1943, § 23-1513;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 9.

Abstracter must consult numerical index as well as general index. Crook v. Chilvers, 99 Neb. 684, 157 N.W. 617 (1916).

Index is a public record, and register of deeds must report fees received for certified copy of same. State ex rel. Miller v. Sovereign, 17 Neb. 173, 22 N.W. 353 (1885).